test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-A-nínaa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - nínaawa - ok : # -m animate noun, dog AEW NA1
     nínaawa+NA+Sg: nínaawa
     nínaawa+NA+Pl: nínaaiksi
     nínaawa+NA+Obv: nínaayi
     nínaawa+NA+Non: nínaaí
     
     nínaawa+NA+Px1Sg+Sg: nitsínaama
     nínaawa+NA+Px1Sg+Pl: nitsínaamiksi
     nínaawa+NA+Px1Sg+Obv: nitsínaami
     nínaawa+NA+Px1Sg+Non: nitsínaami
     
     nínaawa+NA+Px1Pl+Sg: nitsínaaminnaana
     nínaawa+NA+Px1Pl+Pl: nitsínaaminnaaniksi
     nínaawa+NA+Px1Pl+Obv: nitsínaaminnaani
     nínaawa+NA+Px1Pl+Non: nitsínaaminnaani

     nínaawa+NA+Px21Pl+Sg: kitsínaaminnoona
     nínaawa+NA+Px21Pl+Pl: kitsínaaminnooniksi
     nínaawa+NA+Px21Pl+Obv: kitsínaaminnooni
     nínaawa+NA+Px21Pl+Non: kitsínaaminnooni

     nínaawa+NA+Px2Sg+Sg: kitsínaama
     nínaawa+NA+Px2Sg+Pl: kitsínaamiksi
     nínaawa+NA+Px2Sg+Obv: kitsínaami
     nínaawa+NA+Px2Sg+Non: kitsínaami

     nínaawa+NA+Px2Pl+Sg: kitsínaamoaawa
     nínaawa+NA+Px2Pl+Pl: kitsínaamoaawaiksi
     nínaawa+NA+Px2Pl+Obv: kitsínaamoaawayi
     nínaawa+NA+Px2Pl+Non: kitsínaamoaawai

     nínaawa+NA+Px3Sg+Sg: otsínaama
     nínaawa+NA+Px3Sg+Pl: otsínaamiksi
     nínaawa+NA+Px3Sg+Obv: otsínaami
     nínaawa+NA+Px3Sg+Non: otsínaami

     nínaawa+NA+Px3Pl+Sg: otsínaamoaawa
     nínaawa+NA+Px3Pl+Pl: otsínaamoaawaiksi
     nínaawa+NA+Px3Pl+Obv: otsínaamoaawayi
     nínaawa+NA+Px3Pl+Non: otsínaamoaawai
